Washington statutes.
RCW 43.130.030

Excluded employment and employees.

Excluded employment and excluded employees under this chapter include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) State employment related to a single project under a program separately financed by a grant of nonstate funds, federal funds or state funds, or by a combination of such funding, which is designed to provide training or employment opportunities, expertise or additional manpower related to the project or which, because of the nature of the project funding requirements, is not intended as a permanent program.

(2) Activities at least seventy-five percent federally funded by a categorical grant for a specific purpose and any other activities terminated because of actions taken by the federal government or other funding sources other than the state of Washington in eliminating or substantially limiting funding sources, except to the extent that the federal government or such other funding sources may permit the use of nonstate funds to pay for any employee benefits authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(3) The following categories of employees are excluded from benefits under this chapter:

(a) employees refusing transfer to vacant positions in the same or a like job classification and at not more than one full range lower than the same salary range;

(b) classified employees having other than permanent status in the classified service;

(c) employees having less than three years' consecutive state service as an employee, except that such employees shall nonetheless be eligible for the benefits provided in subsections (1), (2), (4) and (5) of RCW 43.130.040.

(d) nothing in this chapter shall affect any other rights currently held by classified employees regarding reduction in force procedures and subsequent reemployment.

[ 1973 2nd ex.s. c 37 s 3.]